Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.040

Punishment for contempt.

A criminal act which at the same time constitutes contempt of court, and has been punished as such, may also be punished as a crime, but in such case the punishment for contempt may be considered in mitigation.

[ 1909 c 249 s 21; RRS s 2273.]

NOTES:

Contempt: Chapter 7.21 RCW.